cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/js/vendor/speak/dictsource/lv_rules
//t
        tet)	o       (v	o
       _tēl)    o       (tu_    uo      // tēlotu
        tikk)   o       (_      uo      // tikko
        tip)    o               o
       _t)	o	(+      uo
        t)      o       (dL07_+ o:      // ..tode
        t)	o       (ks	o
        t)      o       (lL04_+ o:      // ..tola
        t)      o       (ler    o
        t)	omo	        omo
                o       (nakt_  uo      // šonakt/tonakt
        t)      o       (mas    o
       _t)      o       (nusL03_ o:     // tonuss
        t)	o       (n	o
        t)	o       (nn	o
        t)      o       (nikL04_ o:     // ..tonika
        t)      o       (nisk   o:
        t) 	o       (nL05_  uo      // ..tonis (uo)
        t) 	o       (rn+    uo      
        t) 	o       (rņ+    uo
       _t)      o       (nijL04_ o       // Tonija
        t)	o       (niz	o
       _t)      o       (pb     o       // topbura
       _t)      o       (pāzL03_  o     // topāzs
       _t)      o       (pinam  o       // topinambūrs
       _t)      o       (pm     o       // topmasts
       _t) 	opo     (g      opo
       _t) 	opo     (l      opo
       _t) 	opo     (n      opo
        t) 	opo     (t      uopuo
        t) 	opo     (š      uopuo
        t)	o       (ra	o  
        t)	o       (rā	o  
       _t)      o       (reiz_  uo      // toreiz
       _t) 	o       (rud	uo      // toruden
        t)	o       (r	o
       _t)      o       (re     o       // toreadors
        t)      o       (rL07_++ o:     //..tore 
       _t)      o       (rijL03_ o:     // torijs
        t)	o       (ro	o
       @t) 	o       (r	o:  
       _t)      o       (rpAd   o       
       _t)      o       (rtL07_ o       // torte
        t)      o       (tēm    o
        trak)   o 	        uo
        tri)	o	        o
       _tr)     o       (j      o       // Troja
        tr)	o       (p	o:
        tr)     o       (fL04_  o:      // ..trofa
        tr)     o       (m      o
       _tr)     op      (L03_   uop	// trops
        tr)     o       (t 	o
       _t)      o       (ziem_  uo      // toziem
        turb)   o               o

//u
       _ulbr)   o       (kL04_  o	// Ulbroka
        ut)     o       (pi     o:      

//v
        vab)    o       (lL07_  uo      // ..vabole
        vag)	o       (n	uo      // vagon..
        vann)   o               uo
        vask)   o               uo
        vel)    o               o
       versm)   o               uo      // versmo
        vide)   o	        o:
       _vit)    o       (ldL03_ o       // Vitolds
        vīt)    o       (lL03_  uo      // ..vītols
        vizm)	o	        uo
        v)	o       (b	o
        v)	o       (lej	o
        v)      o       (ld     o  
        v)	o       (lf	o
        v)      o       (lv     o  
        v)      o       (lu     o
        v)      o       (lt     o
        v)      o       (ka     o

//z
        zaig)	o	        uo
        zaim)	o	        uo
        zig)    o       (tL03_  o       // ..zigots
        zil)	o       (n	uo
        zil)	o       (ņ	uo
        z)	o       (n	o:
        z)	o       (nd	o  
        z)	o       (nAto   o
        z)      o       (rL07_++ o:     //..zore
        z)	o       (jL03_+	o       //..zojs
        z)	o       (rL03_+	o:      //..zors
        žir) 	o	        o
        ž)	o       (ng	o
        ž)      o       (kej    o

                                        // exception by whole words
        _k)     o       (pā_    uo      
        _sast)  o       (pam_   uo

.group ō
        ō        o:

.group p
        p       p
       _)       pus     pus

.group q
        q        kv

.group r
        r        R2

.group ŗ
        ŗ        r

.group s
        s        s


.group š
        š        S

.group t
        t        t
     s) t (s     t:
    _)	to (_	tuo

.group u
        u        u
        ui       ui

.group ū
        ū        u:

.group v
        v       v
     _) vis	vis

.group w
        w        v


.group x
        x        ks


.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z

.group ž
        ž        Z

.group
            '
            !           _:izsaukumzi:me_:
            ! (\!
            :            kols
        D_) : (_DD_             // omit colon in time, eg: 2:30
            $            dola:ri
            !=           nav||viena:ds
            >=           l'iela:ks||,vai||v'iena:ds
            <=           maza:ks||,vai||v'iena:ds


        __) - (_D        mi:nus
        A_) - (_D        _
        C_) - (_D        _

      \#\#) # (_        _::
        A_) #           R2esti:te
        C_) #           R2esti:te
        \#) #

            . (.        _:
        \.) .
